North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 2A. Consolidated Human Services.

§ 108A-15.1.
Consolidated human services board; human services director.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and subject to any limitations that may be imposed by the board of county commissioners under

G.S. 153A-77

, a consolidated human services board created pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77

(b) shall have the responsibility and authority to carry out the programs established in this Chapter in conformity with the rules and regulations of the Social Services Commission and under the supervision of the Department of Health and Human Services in the same manner as a county social services board.

In addition to the powers conferred by

G.S. 153A-77(d)

, a consolidated human services board shall have all the powers and duties of a county board of social services as provided by

G.S. 108A-9

, except that the consolidated human services board may not:

Appoint the human services director.

Transmit or present the budget for social services programs.

In addition to the powers conferred by

G.S. 153A-77(e)

, a human services director shall have all the powers and duties of a director of social services provided by

G.S. 108A-14

, except that the human services director may:

Serve as the executive officer of the consolidated human services board only to the extent and in the manner authorized by the county manager.

Appoint staff of the consolidated human services agency only upon the approval of the county manager.

History.

1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 9; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§§ 108A-15.2 through 108A-15.6.

Reserved for future codification purposes.